web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.dic
abstras/G
abtinut/G
ademenesc/I
admis/G
adus/G
afanisesc/I
agheismuiesc/I
ajuns/G
alburesc/I
ales/G
alipesc/I
amintesc/I
anasonnemtesc/I
antepus/G
apartinut/G
aprins/G
aprobaluiesc/I
apus/G
arestaluiesc/I
arhieresc/I
ars/G
arvonesc/I
ascuns/G
asemeluiesc/I
asupresc/I
atins/G
atras/G
autodefinesc/I
autodistrus/G
asternut/G
atintesc/I
behai/I
betejesc/I
bildungsromanesc/I
blagoslovesc/I
blonzesc/I
bocanesc/I
bolborosesc/I
bolanzesc/I
bortelesc/I
bosorogesc/I
brostesc/I
branuiesc/I
bucatesc/I
buiecesc/I
bumbacesc/I
burzuluiesc/I
bacai/I
baraiesc/I
badadaiesc/I
balmajesc/I
balaganesc/I
banatenesc/I
batucesc/I
caftesc/I
carnavalesc/I
cavaleresc/I
cepaiesc/I
cernut/G
cervantesc/I
chefuiesc/I
chenaruiesc/I
chihaiesc/I
chircesc/I
chiulesc/I
cihaiesc/I
ciobanesc/I
ciontesc/I
ciosmolesc/I
ciucesc/I
ciungesc/I
clefetesc/I
clipesc/I
clopotesc/I
clampanesc/I
cobarluiesc/I
cocosesc/I
cojesc/I
colacesc/I
comis/G
compus/G
conceput/G
condus/G
conlocuiesc/I
constrans/G
contraputs/G
contraservesc/I
contrazis/G
convins/G
continut/G
copoiesc/I
corespuns/G
corhanesc/I
cosorasc/I
cotonogesc/I
covasesc/I
criminalicesc/I
cracnesc/I
ctitoricesc/I
cules/G
cumetresc/I
cuprins/G
curs/G
curvasaresc/I
carcesc/I
carmuiesc/I
cacaresc/I
calafatuiesc/I
capresc/I
caruntesc/I
catanesc/I
damblagesc/I
decis/G
decurs/G
dedus/G
demis/G
demonicesc/I
depins/G
deplans/G
deprins/G
depus/G
deschiaburesc/I
deschis/G
descins/G
descompus/G
descretesc/I
despironesc/I
desprins/G
despriponesc/I
despartit/GO
destainuiesc/I
dezaerisesc/I
dezdoiesc/I
dezis/G
dezmeticesc/I
dezrobesc/I
detinut/G
diaconesc/I
dilesc/I
discernut/G
disjuns/G
dispus/G
distins/G
distras/G
distrus/G
doctoresc/I
doicesc/I
donchihotesc/I
dosesc/I
dres/G
drumuiesc/I
dranganesc/I
duhovnicesc/I
dupaiesc/I
dus/G
daltuiesc/I
dascalesc/I
emers/G
emis/G
evreiesc/I
exclus/G
expus/G
fecioresc/I
fericesc/I
filozofesc/I
fleoncanesc/I
folfaiesc/I
fosnaiesc/I
fript/G
frant/G
framanturesc/I
functionaresc/I
fasai/I
falosesc/I
fatuiesc/I
ghebosesc/I
ghintuiesc/I
giuruiesc/I
golanesc/I
grofesc/I
graiesc/I
gacesc/I
gangai/I
galbejesc/I
gavozdesc/I
hartuiesc/I
hlizesc/I
hondranesc/I
horopsesc/I
hrenuiesc/I
hulesc/I
hutanesc/I
harsnesc/I
habucesc/I
haladuiesc/I
harhatesc/I
haratesc/I
hauiesc/I
iepuresc/I
impus/G
inclus/G
indispus/G
indus/G
inflipt/G
interpus/G
intervertesc/I
interzis/G
introdus/G
iscodesc/I
ispasesc/I
iurusesc/I
izbandesc/I
jecmanesc/I
jertfesc/I
jimbesc/I
judecatoresc/I
justapus/G
jacmanesc/I
legiuiesc/I
lemncainesc/I
lepuiesc/I
lihnesc/I
lingaresc/I
lins/G
logodesc/I
lustruiesc/I
lafaiesc/I
larmuiesc/I
maghicesc/I
manglesc/I
matisesc/I
mecai/I
menesc/I
mentinut/G
mestesugaresc/I
mionesc/I
mitesc/I
molipsesc/I
moscalesc/I
mosuroiesc/I
muls/G
murdarisesc/I
macai/I
matesc/I
marginesc/I
matalnicesc/I
negustoresc/I
nerozesc/I
nins/G
notaluiesc/I
nadajduiesc/I
nascocesc/I
obidesc/I
obtinut/G
ochesc/I
oferit/GO
olecaiesc/I
omis/G
opus/G
orbecaiesc/I
osandesc/I
otelesc/I
paradosesc/I
parcurs/G
pehlivanesc/I
perceput/G
permis/G
peticesc/I
petrecut/G
pingalesc/I
piui/I
plesnesc/I
plugaresc/I
plans/G
pocanesc/I
politienesc/I
porcaiesc/I
potmolesc/I
precovarsesc/I
predispus/G
prelins/G
presupus/G
pretins/G
prezis/G
pretuiesc/I
priceput/G
prilejesc/I
primis/G
prins/G
probaluiesc/I
produs/G
promis/G
propus/G
proslavesc/I
pranzesc/I
pufaiesc/I
pus/G
palpai/I
pacatosesc/I
pamantenesc/I
pasuiesc/I
patruns/G
readancesc/I
rebalacaresc/I
refacut/G
respins/G
rocosesc/I
rotunjesc/I
rupt/G
rusuiesc/I
ras/G
rabuiesc/I
ragut/G
ramas/G
rapus/G
raresc/I
rasfrant/G
raspuns/G
rasinteles/G
rasaritenesc/I
raznesc/I
satanicesc/I
scobesc/I
scos/G
scriitoricesc/I
scurs/G
secatuiesc/I
sedus/G
sfintesc/I
siguripsesc/I
simtit/GO
slavonesc/I
slavesc/I
smuls/G
smantanesc/I
somnambulesc/I
spihirisesc/I
spus/G
sparcuiesc/I
stoborasc/I
strunjesc/I
strans/G
strapuns/G
stapanesc/I
subjugat/G
sultanesc/I
supraprodus/G
suprapus/G
supt/G
supus/G
surnumesc/I
sustras/G
sustinut/G
sapunesc/I
terciuiesc/I
tiohaiesc/I
tologesc/I
tradus/G
transmis/G
transpus/G
tras/G
trecut/G
trimis/G
troienesc/I
tuflesc/I
tanjesc/I
tagaduiesc/I
tatanesc/I
undesc/I
uns/G
utaluiesc/I
viersuiesc/I
vornicesc/I
vravuiesc/I
vacsuiesc/I
vatuiesc/I
zborasc/I
zbatucesc/I
zeiesc/I
zgancioresc/I
zis/G
zobesc/I
zupaiesc/I
zazai/I
zalezesc/I
zapai/I
imblanesc/I
imbatranesc/I
impins/G
impuns/G
imputernicesc/I
impartit/GO
inauresc/I
inceput/G
inchis/G
incins/G
incrucesc/I
indosesc/I
infipt/G
infrant/G
infratesc/I
injosesc/I
innoroiesc/I
instaresc/I
intins/G
intrecut/G
intrerupt/G
intretinut/G
intrunesc/I
invins/G
invrednicesc/I
inzavorasc/I
inteles/G
scolesc/I
sindruiesc/I
sontorogesc/I
spicaluiesc/I
sters/G
stocalesc/I
surubuiesc/I
tesut/G
tiganesc/I
tinut/G
tuhaiesc/I
tandaresc/I
